Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-809
Reciprocity; continuing competency requirements; military spouse; temporary license.

(1) An applicant for licensure to practice chiropractic who has met the standards set by the board pursuant to section 38-126 for a license based on licensure in another jurisdiction but is not practicing at the time of application for licensure shall present proof satisfactory to the department that he or she has within the two years immediately preceding the application for licensure completed continuing competency requirements approved by the board pursuant to section 38-145.

(2) An applicant who is a military spouse may apply for a temporary license as provided in section 38-129.01.

Laws 1927, c. 167, § 80, p. 475;

C.S.1929, § 71-1105;

R.S.1943, § 71-181;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 406;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-181;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 324;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 250;

Laws 2017, LB88, § 42.